Utah statutes.
32B-11-204.   Renewal requirements for a manufacturing license.

(1)  A manufacturing license expires on December 31 of each year.

(2)  To renew a manufacturing license, a person shall submit by no later than November 30 of the year the license expires:

(a)  a completed renewal application to the department, in a form prescribed by the department; and

(b)  a renewal fee in the following amount of:

(i)  $2,900, except for a wine manufacturing license described in Subsection (2)(b)(ii); or

(ii)  $1,400 for a winery manufacturing license if the winery manufacturing licensee produces less than 20,000 gallons of wine in the calendar year preceding the year in which the manufacturing licensee seeks renewal.

(3)  Failure to meet the renewal requirements results in an automatic forfeiture of a manufacturing license effective on the date the existing manufacturing license expires.

